Utah statutes.
35A-4-407.   Voluntary income tax withholding.
(1)  The department shall advise an individual filing a new claim for benefits
at the time of filing the claim that:
(a)  unemployment benefits may be subject to federal, state, and local income
tax;
(b)  there are requirements for estimating tax payments;
(c)  the individual may elect to have federal income tax deducted and withheld
from the individual’s payment of benefits at the amount specified by the
Internal Revenue Code;
(d)  the individual may elect to have state income tax deducted and withheld
from the individual’s payment of benefits at the rate of 5%; and
(e)  the individual may change a previously elected withholding status.
(2)  Amounts deducted and withheld from benefits for income taxes under
Subsection (1)  shall remain in the unemployment trust fund until transferred
to the federal or state taxing authority as a payment of income tax.
(3) (a)  The department shall follow all procedures specified by the United
States Department of Labor, the Internal Revenue Service, and the State Tax
Commission pertaining to deducting, withholding, and submitting amounts
deducted and withheld for income taxes.
(b)  Amounts deducted and withheld for income taxes under this section shall
be deducted and withheld only after amounts are deducted and withheld for:
(i)  overpayment of unemployment compensation;
(ii)  child support obligations; or
(iii)  any other amount required to be deducted and withheld under this
chapter.
